Florida, session 2026, SB1158.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 58 59 Section 1.âSection 381.02036, Florida Statutes, is created 60 to read: 61 381.02036âInternational drug reference pricing.âThe Agency 62 for Health Care Administration shall contract with an entity to 63 designate reference price source countries and analyze the data 64 submitted under s. 499.044 to establish the reference price for 65 each prescribed drug. 66 (1)(a)âThe list of reference price source countries must 67 include only countries with a real gross domestic product per 68 capita of at least 60 percent of the United States gross 69 domestic product per capita, using international sales, volume, 70 and pricing data for each country. For the purposes of this 71 paragraph, the term âreal gross domestic product per capitaâ 72 means a countryâs most recent estimate based on purchasing power 73 parity for that country available in the most recent edition of 74 the United States Central Intelligence Agency World Factbook. 75 Countries with single-payer health care systems, which include 76 whole-market government price-setting for prescription drugs, 77 must be excluded. The agency contractor shall reevaluate the 78 designated reference price source countries annually and shall 79 revise the list as needed. 80 (b)âThe agency contractor shall weight the reference price 81 benchmark value of the selected reference price source countries 82 and sort the countries into two or more tiers, using an 83 established index measuring the level of health care system 84 market orientation in each country. 85 (2)(a)âThe agency contractor shall analyze the data 86 submitted under s. 499.044 to compare prices among source 87 countries using a publicly available, reliable, and consistent 88 exchange rate source. The agency contractor shall establish the 89 reference price for each prescribed drug, which must be the 90 lowest price, after adjusting for volume and difference in 91 national gross domestic product, identified in the source 92 countries. A reference price is not required to be established 93 for a drug that has a domestic price determined by the 94 contractor to be competitive with foreign prices; however, the 95 agency contractor shall identify and report such drugs and their 96 reference prices to the agency. 97 (b)âThe agency contractor shall prioritize drugs that have 98 little or no competition in the domestic market or that have the 99 greatest difference between the domestic price and the reference 100 price, including, but not limited to, brand name and single 101 source drugs. 102 (3)âThe agency contractor shall update the reference prices 103 annually and may reevaluate and update a specific reference 104 price at any time based on a significant change documented by 105 supplemental pricing data submitted by a manufacturer under s. 106 499.044(3). 107 (4)âThe agency contractor shall provide to the agency the 108 reference prices no later than January 1 each year, and the 109 agency shall publish the reference prices online within 10 days 110 after receipt. 111 Section 2.âSubsection (3) is added to section 465.0244, 112 Florida Statutes, to read: 113 465.0244âInformation disclosure; reference prices.â 114 (3)âA pharmacy may not charge a cash-paying customer an 115 amount greater than the reference price established under s. 116 381.02036 for a prescribed drug or biological product. The limit 117 on a drug or biological product charge applies only to the drug 118 or biological product itself and does not apply to any 119 dispensing fee. 120 Section 3.âSection 499.044, Florida Statutes, is created to 121 read: 122 499.044âInternational drug reference pricing.â 123 (1)âIt is the intent of the Legislature that patients and 124 third-party payors in this state should not pay more for 125 prescription drugs than those in international markets. 126 (2)âAs used in this section, the term âprescription drugâ 127 or âdrugâ has the same meaning as the term âprescription drugâ 128 in s. 499.003 and includes biological products. The term is 129 limited to those prescription drugs and biological products 130 intended for human use. 131 (3)âBeginning October 1, 2026, each prescription drug 132 manufacturer permitholder and nonresident prescription drug 133 manufacturer permitholder shall annually report international 134 prescription drug price data to the Agency for Health Care 135 Administration. 136 (a)âPermitholders shall annually report the actual 137 outpatient payment or reimbursement amounts for each prescribed 138 drug in each reference price source country identified pursuant 139 to s. 381.02036, including amounts paid by both third-party 140 payors, such as insurers and public health coverage programs, 141 and by individual consumers not using third-party payors, net of 142 rebates and other forms of discounts. Permitholders may report 143 to the agency the average payment amounts for each drug for a 144 reference price source country, if weighted by utilization 145 volume and fully documented. 146 (b)âPermitholders may provide supplemental price data at 147 any time during the year, based on price changes in a reference 148 price source country. 149 (c)âPermitholders shall report the data in a format 150 established by the agency in consultation with the contractor 151 established under s. 381.02036. 152 (d)âThe penalty for failure to timely report required data 153 is a fine of $10,000 a day for the first 30 days, and permit 154 suspension thereafter until compliance is achieved. 155 Section 4.âPresent paragraphs (b), (c) through (f), (g) 156 through (j), and (k) through (x) of subsection (1) of section 157 626.8825, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as paragraphs (c), 158 (f) through (i), (k) through (n), and (p) through (cc), 159 respectively, paragraph (h) of subsection (2) and paragraph (h) 160 of subsection (3) are amended, and new paragraphs (b), (d), (e), 161 (j), and (o) are added to subsection (1) of that section, to 162 read: 163 626.8825âPharmacy benefit manager transparency and 164 accountability.â 165 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 166 (b)ââAffiliated manufacturerâ means a drug or biological 167 product manufacturer that, either directly or indirectly through 168 one or more intermediaries: 169 1.âHas an investment or ownership interest in a pharmacy 170 benefit manager holding a certificate of authority issued under 171 this part; 172 2.âShares common ownership with a pharmacy benefit manager 173 holding a certificate of authority issued under this part; or 174 3.âHas an investor or a holder of an ownership interest 175 which is a pharmacy benefit manager holding a certificate of 176 authority issued under this part. 177 (d)ââBiological productâ has the same meaning as in s. 351 178 of the federal Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. s. 262. 179 (e)ââBiosimilarâ has the same meaning as in s. 351 of the 180 federal Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. s. 262. 181 (j)ââDrugâ has the same meaning as in s. 499.003. 182 (o)ââInterchangeableâ has the same meaning as in s. 351 of 183 the federal Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. s. 262. 184 (2)âCONTRACTS BETWEEN A PHARMACY BENEFIT MANAGER AND A 185 PHARMACY BENEFITS PLAN OR PROGRAM.âIn addition to any other 186 requirements in the Florida Insurance Code, all contractual 187 arrangements executed, amended, adjusted, or renewed on or after 188 July 1, 2023, which are applicable to pharmacy benefits covered 189 on or after January 1, 2024, between a pharmacy benefit manager 190 and a pharmacy benefits plan or program must include, in 191 substantial form, terms that ensure compliance with all of the 192 following requirements and that, except to the extent not 193 allowed by law, shall supersede any contractual terms to the 194 contrary: 195 (h)1.âAt a minimum, require the pharmacy benefit manager or 196 pharmacy benefits plan or program to, upon revising its 197 formulary of covered prescription drugs during a plan year, 198 provide a 60-day continuity-of-care period in which the covered 199 prescription drug that is being revised from the formulary 200 continues to be provided at the same cost for the patient for a 201 period of 60 days. The 60-day continuity-of-care period 202 commences upon notification to the patient. This requirement 203 does not apply if the covered prescription drug: 204 a.âHas been approved and made available over the counter by 205 the United States Food and Drug Administration and has entered 206 the commercial market as such; 207 b.âHas been removed or withdrawn from the commercial market 208 by the manufacturer; or 209 c.âIs subject to an involuntary recall by state or federal 210 authorities and is no longer available on the commercial market. 211 2.âProhibit the pharmacy benefit manager from offering or 212 implementing a formulary that requires a covered person to 213 receive a drug or biological product manufactured by an 214 affiliated manufacturer when there is an available generically 215 equivalent drug or an available biological product that is 216 biosimilar to and interchangeable for the prescribed biological 217 product. 218 3.2.âBeginning January 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, 219 the pharmacy benefits plan or program shall submit to the 220 office, under the penalty of perjury, a statement attesting to 221 its compliance with the requirements of this subsection. 222 (3)âCONTRACTS BETWEEN A PHARMACY BENEFIT MANAGER AND A 223 PARTICIPATING PHARMACY.âIn addition to other requirements in the 224 Florida Insurance Code, a participation contract executed, 225 amended, adjusted, or renewed on or after July 1, 2023, that 226 applies to pharmacist services on or after January 1, 2024, 227 between a pharmacy benefit manager and one or more pharmacies or 228 pharmacists, must include, in substantial form, terms that 229 ensure compliance with all of the following requirements, and 230 that, except to the extent not allowed by law, shall supersede 231 any contractual terms in the participation contract to the 232 contrary: 233 (h)âThe pharmacy benefit manager shall provide a reasonable 234 administrative appeal procedure to allow a pharmacy or 235 pharmacist to challenge the maximum allowable cost pricing 236 information and the reimbursement made under the maximum 237 allowable cost as defined in s. 627.64741 for a specific drug as 238 being below the acquisition cost available to the challenging 239 pharmacy or pharmacist. 240 1.âThe administrative appeal procedure must include a 241 telephone number and e-mail address, or a website, for the 242 purpose of submitting the administrative appeal. The appeal may 243 be submitted by the pharmacy or an agent of the pharmacy 244 directly to the pharmacy benefit manager or through a pharmacy 245 service administration organization. The administrative appeal 246 procedure must allow a pharmacy or pharmacist the option to 247 submit a consolidated administrative appeal representing 248 multiple substantially similar claims. The pharmacy or 249 pharmacist must be given at least 30 business days after a 250 maximum allowable cost update or after an adjudication for an 251 electronic claim or reimbursement for a nonelectronic claim to 252 file the administrative appeal. 253 2.âThe pharmacy benefit manager must respond to the 254 administrative appeal within 30 business days after receipt of 255 the appeal. 256 3.âIf the appeal is upheld, the pharmacy benefit manager 257 must: 258 a.âUpdate the maximum allowable cost pricing information to 259 at least the acquisition cost available to the pharmacy; 260 b.âPermit the pharmacy or pharmacist to reverse and rebill 261 the claim in question; 262 c.âProvide to the pharmacy or pharmacist the national drug 263 code on which the increase or change is based; and 264 d.âMake the increase or change effective for each similarly 265 situated pharmacy or pharmacist who is subject to the applicable 266 maximum allowable cost pricing information. 267 4.âIf the appeal is denied, the pharmacy benefit manager 268 must provide to the pharmacy or pharmacist the national drug 269 code and the name of the national or regional pharmaceutical 270 wholesalers operating in this state which have the drug 271 currently in stock at a price below the maximum allowable cost 272 pricing information. 273 5.âEvery 90 days, a pharmacy benefit manager shall report 274 to the office the total number of appeals received and denied in 275 the preceding 90-day period, with an explanation or reason for 276 each denial, for each specific drug for which an appeal was 277 submitted pursuant to this paragraph. 278 Section 5.âSubsections (8) and (9) are added to section 279 626.8827, Florida Statutes, to read: 280 626.8827âPharmacy benefit manager prohibited practices.âIn 281 addition to other prohibitions in this part, a pharmacy benefit 282 manager may not do any of the following: 283 (8)âProhibit or restrict a pharmacy or pharmacist from 284 declining to dispense a drug if the reimbursement rate is less 285 than the actual acquisition cost incurred or which would be 286 incurred by the pharmacy or pharmacist. 287 (9)âReimburse a pharmacy or pharmacist less than it 288 reimburses an affiliated pharmacy or pharmacist, as those terms 289 are defined in s. 626.8825. 290 Section 6.âSection 627.4231, Florida Statutes, is created 291 to read: 292 627.4231âInsurance reimbursement of prescribed drugs at 293 reference prices.â 294 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 295 (a)ââBiological productâ has the same meaning as in s. 351 296 of the federal Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. s. 262. 297 (b)ââHealth insurerâ means an authorized insurer offering 298 health insurance as defined in s. 624.603, a managed care plan 299 as defined in s. 409.962(10), a health maintenance organization 300 as defined in s. 641.19, or the state group insurance program as 301 established in part I of chapter 110. 302 (c)ââPrescription drugâ or âdrugâ has the same meaning as 303 the term âprescription drugâ in s. 499.003 and includes 304 biological products. The term is limited to those prescription 305 drugs and biological products intended for human use. 306 (2)âA health insurer that provides coverage for outpatient 307 prescription drugs shall provide reimbursement for a covered 308 prescription drug for which there is a reference price under s. 309 381.02036 in an amount no greater than the reference price. This 310 subsection applies to drug reimbursement and does not apply to 311 any covered dispensing or administration fee established under 312 the terms of the provider contract. 313 (3)(a)âSavings generated under subsection (2) must be used 314 to reduce policyholder premiums and cost sharing as defined in 315 s. 627.42391(1). Each health insurer shall document anticipated 316 savings and premium reductions in rate filings beginning with 317 the first rate filing following the availability of reference 318 prices under s. 381.02036. 319 (b)âEach health insurer shall assess the actuarial effect 320 of the reference pricing under s. 381.02036 for each insurer 321 product for each plan year. Beginning April 1 following the 322 first full plan year in which reference prices under s. 323 381.02036 apply to prescription drug reimbursement, each health 324 insurer shall submit an annual report on the assessed effect to 325 the Office of Insurance Regulation or the Agency for Health Care 326 Administration, as applicable. 327 (4)âThe requirements of this section apply to prescription 328 drug coverage in the Medicaid program established in chapter 409 329 to the extent a reference price established under s. 381.02036 330 generates greater savings for the program than that provided by 331 the state supplemental rebate program established under s. 332 409.912. 333 (5)âBeginning January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the 334 Office of Insurance Regulation and the Agency for Health Care 335 Administration shall submit a joint report to the Governor, the 336 President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 337 Representatives detailing the impact of subsections (2), (3), 338 and (4) in the preceding year, including savings realized 339 compared to prescription drug pricing in the United States not 340 using this pricing model, any problems encountered, any barriers 341 to accessing prescription drugs, the domestic and foreign 342 prescription drug market response, the monitoring and evaluation 343 of the impact on prescription drug program or plan beneficiary 344 access, the quality of care, and the program costs. 345 Section 7.âSection 627.42398, Florida Statutes, is created 346 to read: 347 627.42398âInsurance policies; limiting changes to 348 prescription drug formularies.â 349 (1)âOther than at the time of coverage renewal, an 350 individual or group insurance policy that is delivered, issued 351 for delivery, renewed, amended, or continued in this state and 352 that provides medical, major medical, or similar comprehensive 353 coverage may not, while the insured is taking a prescription 354 drug: 355 (a)âRemove the prescription drug from its list of covered 356 drugs during the policy year unless the United States Food and 357 Drug Administration has issued a statement about the drug which 358 calls into question the clinical safety of the drug; the 359 manufacturer of the drug has notified the United States Food and 360 Drug Administration of a manufacturing discontinuance or 361 potential discontinuance of the drug as required by s. 506C of 362 the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. s. 356c; or 363 the drug has been approved and made available over the counter 364 by the United States Food and Drug Administration and has 365 entered the commercial market as such. 366 (b)âReclassify the drug to a more restrictive drug tier or 367 increase the amount that an insured must pay for a copayment, 368 coinsurance, or deductible for prescription drug benefits, or 369 reclassify the drug to a higher cost-sharing tier during the 370 policy year. 371 372 This subsection applies to drugs for which an insurer negotiates 373 a single acquisition price that will be in effect for the entire 374 plan year. 375 (2)âThis section does not: 376 (a)âProhibit the addition of prescription drugs to the list 377 of drugs covered under the policy during the policy year. 378 (b)âApply to a grandfathered health plan as defined in s. 379 627.402 or to benefits set forth in s. 627.6513(1)-(14). 380 (c)âAlter or amend s. 465.025, which provides conditions 381 under which a pharmacist may substitute a generically equivalent 382 drug product for a brand name drug product. 383 (d)âAlter or amend s. 465.0252, which provides conditions 384 under which a pharmacist may dispense a substitute biological 385 product for the prescribed biological product. 386 (e)âApply to a Medicaid managed care plan under part IV of 387 chapter 409. 388 Section 8.âParagraph (e) of subsection (5) of section 389 627.6699, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 390 627.6699âEmployee Health Care Access Act.â 391 (5)âAVAILABILITY OF COVERAGE.â 392 (e)âAll health benefit plans issued under this section must 393 comply with the following conditions: 394 1.âFor employers who have fewer than two employees, a late 395 enrollee may be excluded from coverage for no longer than 24 396 months if he or she was not covered by creditable coverage 397 continually to a date not more than 63 days before the effective 398 date of his or her new coverage. 399 2.âAny requirement used by a small employer carrier in 400 determining whether to provide coverage to a small employer 401 group, including requirements for minimum participation of 402 eligible employees and minimum employer contributions, must be 403 applied uniformly among all small employer groups having the 404 same number of eligible employees applying for coverage or 405 receiving coverage from the small employer carrier, except that 406 a small employer carrier that participates in, administers, or 407 issues health benefits pursuant to s. 381.0406 which do not 408 include a preexisting condition exclusion may require as a 409 condition of offering such benefits that the employer has had no 410 health insurance coverage for its employees for a period of at 411 least 6 months. A small employer carrier may vary application of 412 minimum participation requirements and minimum employer 413 contribution requirements only by the size of the small employer 414 group. 415 3.âIn applying minimum participation requirements with 416 respect to a small employer, a small employer carrier may shall 417 not consider as an eligible employee employees or dependents who 418 have qualifying existing coverage in an employer-based group 419 insurance plan or an ERISA qualified self-insurance plan in 420 determining whether the applicable percentage of participation 421 is met. However, a small employer carrier may count eligible 422 employees and dependents who have coverage under another health 423 plan that is sponsored by that employer. 424 4.âA small employer carrier may shall not increase any 425 requirement for minimum employee participation or any 426 requirement for minimum employer contribution applicable to a 427 small employer at any time after the small employer has been 428 accepted for coverage, unless the employer size has changed, in 429 which case the small employer carrier may apply the requirements 430 that are applicable to the new group size. 431 5.âIf a small employer carrier offers coverage to a small 432 employer, it must offer coverage to all the small employerâs 433 eligible employees and their dependents. A small employer 434 carrier may not offer coverage limited to certain persons in a 435 group or to part of a group, except with respect to late 436 enrollees. 437 6.âA small employer carrier may not modify any health 438 benefit plan issued to a small employer with respect to a small 439 employer or any eligible employee or dependent through riders, 440 endorsements, or otherwise to restrict or exclude coverage for 441 certain diseases or medical conditions otherwise covered by the 442 health benefit plan. 443 7.âAn initial enrollment period of at least 30 days must be 444 provided. An annual 30-day open enrollment period must be 445 offered to each small employerâs eligible employees and their 446 dependents. A small employer carrier must provide special 447 enrollment periods as required by s. 627.65615. 448 8.âA small employer carrier shall limit changes to 449 prescription drug formularies as required by s. 627.42398. 450 Section 9.âSubsection (6) is added to section 641.30, 451 Florida Statutes, to read: 452 641.30âConstruction and relationship to other laws.â 453 (6)âEvery health maintenance organization must comply with 454 s. 627.4231. 455 Section 10.âSubsection (36) of section 641.31, Florida 456 Statutes, is amended to read: 457 641.31âHealth maintenance contracts.â 458 (36)âA health maintenance organization may increase the 459 copayment for any benefit, or delete, amend, or limit any of the 460 benefits to which a subscriber is entitled under the group 461 contract only, upon written notice to the contract holder at 462 least 45 days in advance of the time of coverage renewal. The 463 health maintenance organization may amend the contract with the 464 contract holder, with such amendment to be effective immediately 465 at the time of coverage renewal. The written notice to the 466 contract holder must shall specifically identify any deletions, 467 amendments, or limitations to any of the benefits provided in 468 the group contract during the current contract period which will 469 be included in the group contract upon renewal. This subsection 470 does not apply to any increases in benefits. The 45-day notice 471 requirement does shall not apply if benefits are amended, 472 deleted, or limited at the request of the contract holder. 473 (a)âOther than at the time of coverage renewal, a health 474 maintenance contract that is delivered, issued for delivery, 475 renewed, amended, or continued in this state and that provides 476 medical, major medical, or similar comprehensive coverage may 477 not, while the subscriber is taking a prescription drug: 478 1.âRemove the prescription drug from its list of covered 479 drugs during the policy year or contract year unless the United 480 States Food and Drug Administration has issued a statement about 481 the drug which calls into question the clinical safety of the 482 drug; the manufacturer of the drug has notified the United 483 States Food and Drug Administration of a manufacturing 484 discontinuance or potential discontinuance of the drug as 485 required by s. 506C of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 486 21 U.S.C. s. 356c; or the drug has been approved and made 487 available over the counter by the United States Food and Drug 488 Administration and has entered the commercial market as such. 489 2.âReclassify the drug to a more restrictive drug tier or 490 increase the amount that a subscriber must pay for a copayment, 491 coinsurance, or deductible for prescription drug benefits, or 492 reclassify the drug to a higher cost-sharing tier during the 493 policy year or contract year. 494 495 This paragraph applies to drugs for which a health maintenance 496 organization negotiates a single acquisition price that will be 497 in effect for the entire plan year. 498 (b)âThis subsection does not: 499 1.âProhibit the addition of prescription drugs to the list 500 of drugs covered during the policy year or contract year. 501 2.âApply to a grandfathered health plan as defined in s. 502 627.402 or to benefits set forth in s. 627.6513(1)-(14). 503 3.âAlter or amend s. 465.025, which provides conditions 504 under which a pharmacist may substitute a generically equivalent 505 drug product for a brand name drug product. 506 4.âAlter or amend s. 465.0252, which provides conditions 507 under which a pharmacist may dispense a substitute biological 508 product for the prescribed biological product. 509 5.âApply to a Medicaid managed care plan under part IV of 510 chapter 409. 511 Section 11.âThe Financial Services Commission shall adopt 512 rules to implement sections 4 and 5 of this act by January 1, 513 2027. 514 Section 12.âThe Legislature finds that this act fulfills an 515 important state interest by: 516 (1)âIncreasing medication adherence and reducing the 517 likelihood that Floridians would choose to forego, substitute, 518 or ration prescribed medication and therapies due to high cost, 519 by helping cost-burdened Floridians acquire prescribed 520 medication and therapies at competitive, market-based prices. 521 (2)âEnsuring that residents of this state do not spend more 522 for the same quantity of a prescription drug than residents of 523 other countries, by regulating even-handedly and prospectively, 524 in a historically regulated industry, both resident and 525 nonresident drug manufacturers with regard to international 526 price transparency and international reference-based upper 527 payment limits. 528 (3)âEnsuring that residents of this state are not at a 529 competitive disadvantage compared to residents of other 530 countries, by countering monopolistic and anticompetitive market 531 conditions using international reference-based upper-payment 532 limits regardless of the incidental effect experienced if other 533 states adopt similar legislation. 534 (4)âMaximizing the number of residents of this state with 535 commercial health plan coverage who can access competitive, 536 market-based prices without interfering with nationally uniform 537 plan administration. 538 (5)âRegulating state-licensed activity and establishing a 539 competitive market without depriving drug manufacturers of 540 reasonable opportunities to profit from their investments, by 541 normalizing both the drug prices paid by residents of this state 542 with those the manufacturers accept in other countries and the 543 profit they benefit from in those countries. 544 Section 13.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.